Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
CHAPTER 3 Acquisition of Property for Transportation Purposes

Cross references.

Power of condemnation, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. II.

Exercise by Department of Transportation of power of eminent domain to acquire property for construction of welcome centers, §

50-7-12

.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law of real property, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 319 (1986).